Washington statutes.
RCW 35.85.080

Construction of chapter.

The provisions and remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative of existing provisions and remedies, and nothing herein contained shall be held to repeal any provision of the existing law or of any charter of any city upon the subject matter thereof, but such existing law or charter provision shall continue in full force and effect, and it shall be optional with the city authorities to proceed under either such existing law, charter provision or this chapter.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.85.080. Prior: (i) 1909 ex.s. c 14 s 5; RRS s 9005. (ii) 1925 ex.s. c 168 s 4; RRS s 9005-4.]